Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

Douglas Henry State Museum Commission

4-20-301. Creation — Members.

There is created and established a state commission to be known as the Douglas Henry state museum commission, referred to as “the commission” in this part, to consist of thirteen (13) voting members.

Two (2) members of the commission shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. These members shall serve four-year terms.

Two (2) members of the commission shall be appointed by the speaker of the senate. These members shall serve four-year terms.

Six (6) members of the commission shall be appointed by the governor, with two (2) members to be appointed from each grand division of the state. These members shall serve three-year terms and shall not serve for more than two (2) consecutive terms. The successor of any of these members shall be appointed from their grand division.

One (1) member of the commission shall be appointed jointly by the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives as an at-large member. This member shall serve a three-year term and shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.

One (1) member of the commission shall be the chair of the senate finance, ways and means committee or the chair's designee. One (1) member of the commission shall be the chair of the house of representatives finance, ways and means committee or the chair's designee.

The commission shall include, as an ex officio, nonvoting member, the museum executive director, whose term shall be for so long as the person remains the museum executive director.

The commission shall include, as an ex officio, nonvoting member, the chair of the Tennessee arts commission as of January 1, 2009, who shall serve only one (1) two-year term beginning on July 1, 2009. This member shall serve as a resource to the state museum commission. Notwithstanding § 55-4-301 or § 55-4-216 or any other law to the contrary, this member shall facilitate transition grants awarded from revenue granted from the sale of new specialty earmarked and cultural plates to the state museum commission from the arts commission, with the grant money to be used at the discretion of the museum commission for operating expenses. The commission shall be eligible to receive these transition grants pursuant to the authority granted to the member in this subsection (g) for the period beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2011. Nothing in this subsection (g) shall prohibit the commission from receiving transition grants pursuant to any other authority.

The commission shall include as an ex officio, nonvoting member, the president of the Tennessee historical society or the president's designee, whose term shall begin on July 1, 2015.

In making appointments to the state museum commission, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is a member of a racial minority.

A commission member shall continue to serve until a successor is appointed by the appropriate appointing authority. All vacancies shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term in the same manner as original appointments.

A quorum shall be six (6) voting members of the commission.

Acts 2009, ch. 497, § 1; 2010, ch. 1135, §§ 3, 4; 2013, ch. 478, § 1; 2014, ch. 719, § 1; 2018, ch. 821, §§ 16, 19; 2018, ch. 1023, § 53.

Compiler's Notes. The Douglas Henry state museum commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§4-29-112,4-29-246.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

4-20-302. Qualifications of members — Chair — Service of members without compensation — Expenses.

The members of the commission shall be citizens of the state who have demonstrated active involvement in museums, museum governance, history, art, cultural heritage and enrichment, education and who exemplify fundamental leadership skills and fundraising capabilities.

The commission shall elect a chair from among its appointed membership. The chair shall serve in that capacity for one (1) year and shall be eligible for reelection. The chair shall preside at all meetings and shall have all the powers and privileges of the other members.

The members of the commission shall not receive any compensation for their services but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the commission.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 2009, ch. 497, § 1.

4-20-303. Transfer of duties and functions from the Tennessee arts commission — Function of the commission.

The duties and functions of the Tennessee arts commission relative to the operation of the state museum are transferred to the Douglas Henry state museum commission.

The primary function of the commission shall be to oversee the operations of the state museum. The commission shall also be entrusted with establishing the strategic direction of the museum, with an emphasis on the educational and cultural enrichment of the citizens of this state. The commission shall work to ensure that the citizens of this state have access and exposure to the museum collections and special changing exhibits, and that the current collections are preserved appropriately and exposed to the public. The commission shall also work to ensure that future acquisitions are made in a deliberate manner in support of the mission and goals of the museum, for the purpose of educating the citizens of this state.

Acts 2009, ch. 497, §§ 1, 7.

4-20-304. Powers and authority — Assistance and data from other state entities — Sole governing authority of museum.

The commission is authorized and empowered to:

Oversee the operation of the state museum;

Employ a museum executive director;

Promulgate rules and regulations for its own governance and for the operation and administration of the museum, with the rules and regulations being promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title;

Identify the necessary controls to ensure expenditures in accordance with the law of such public funds as may be appropriated to the commission;

Make regular reports to the general assembly as required; and

Adopt policies designed to fulfill the duties and to attain the objectives of the commission as established by law.

The commission may request and shall receive from any department, division, board, bureau, commission or agency of this state any assistance and data as will enable it properly to carry out its powers and duties under this part.

The commission shall be the sole governing authority of the state museum.

Acts 2009, ch. 497, § 1; 2018, ch. 821, § 17.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

4-20-305. Commission official agency to receive federal funding.

The commission is the official agency of the state to receive federal funding related to the functions of the museum and for regranting to other appropriate entities.

Acts 2009, ch. 497, § 1.